Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1 URBAN RENEWAL
31-25-107. Approval of urban renewal plans by local governing body - definitions.

An authority shall not actually undertake an urban renewal project for an urban renewal area unless based on evidence presented at a public hearing the governing body, by resolution, has determined such area to be a slum, blighted area, or a combination thereof and designated such area as appropriate for an urban renewal project.

Notwithstanding this part 1, and in addition to any other notice required by law, within thirty days of commissioning a study to determine whether an area is a slum, blighted area, or a combination thereof in accordance with the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the authority shall provide notice to any owner of private property located in the area that is the subject of the study by mailing notice to the owner by regular mail at the last-known address of record. The notice shall state that the authority is commencing a study necessary for making a determination as to whether the area in which the owner owns property is a slum or a blighted area. Within seven days of making such determination, the authority or the municipality, as applicable, shall also provide notice of the determination to any owner of private property located in the area that is the subject of the study by mailing notice to the owner by regular mail at the last-known address of record. For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "private property" means, as applied to real property, only a fee ownership interest.

Except for urban renewal plans subject to section 31-25-103 (2)(l), the boundaries of an area that the governing body determines to be a blighted area shall be drawn as narrowly as the governing body determines feasible to accomplish the planning and development objectives of the proposed urban renewal area. The governing body shall not approve an urban renewal plan until a general plan for the municipality has been prepared. An authority shall not acquire real property for an urban renewal project unless the local governing body has approved the urban renewal plan in accordance with subsection (4) of this section. In making the determination as to whether a particular area is blighted pursuant to the provisions of this part 1, any particular condition found to be present may satisfy as many of the factors referenced in section 31-25-103 (2) as are applicable to such condition.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 1, no area that has been designated as an urban renewal area shall contain any agricultural land unless:

The agricultural land is a brownfield site;

Not less than one-half of the urban renewal area as a whole consists of parcels of land containing urban-level development that, at the time of the designation of such area, are determined to constitute a slum or blighted area, or a combination thereof, in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section and not less than two-thirds of the perimeter of the urban renewal area as a whole is contiguous with urban-level development as determined at the time of the designation of such area;

The agricultural land is an enclave within the territorial boundaries of a municipality and the entire perimeter of the enclave has been contiguous with urban-level development for a period of not less than three years as determined at the time of the designation of the area;

Each public body that levies an ad valorem property tax on the agricultural land agrees in writing to the inclusion of the agricultural land within the urban renewal area; or

The agricultural land was included in an approved urban renewal plan prior to June 1, 2010.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 1, for a period commencing on June 1, 2010, and concluding ten years from June 1, 2010, and in addition to the provisions of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), no area that has been designated as an urban renewal area shall contain any agricultural land unless:

The agricultural land is contiguous with an urban renewal area in existence as of June 1, 2010;

The person who is the fee simple owner of the agricultural land as of June 1, 2010, is also the fee simple owner of land within the urban renewal area as of June 1, 2010, that is contiguous with the agricultural land; and

Both the agricultural land and the land within the urban renewal area that is described in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (III) will be developed solely for the purpose of creating primary manufacturing jobs, and any ancillary jobs necessary to support such manufacturing operations, for the duration of the period during which property tax revenues in excess of a base amount are paid into a special fund pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section for the purpose of financing an urban renewal project. For purposes of this subparagraph (III), "primary manufacturing jobs" means manufacturing jobs that produce products that are in excess of those that will be consumed within the boundaries of the state and that are exported to other states and foreign countries in exchange for value.

In the case of an urban renewal plan approved or substantially modified on or after June 1, 2010, the plan shall include a legal description of the urban renewal area, including the legal description of any agricultural land proposed for inclusion within the urban renewal area pursuant to the conditions specified in subparagraph (II) or (III) of paragraph (c) of this subsection (1).

Prior to its approval of an urban renewal plan, the governing body shall submit such plan to the planning commission of the municipality, if any, for review and recommendations as to its conformity with the general plan for the development of the municipality as a whole. The planning commission shall submit its written recommendations with respect to the proposed urban renewal plan to the governing body within thirty days after receipt of the plan for review. Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission or, if no recommendations are received within said thirty days, without such recommendations, the governing body may proceed with the hearing on the proposed urban renewal plan prescribed by subsection (3) of this section.

The governing body shall hold a public hearing on an urban renewal plan or substantial modification of an approved urban renewal plan no less than thirty days after public notice thereof by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality. The notice shall describe the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing, shall generally identify the urban renewal area covered by the plan, and shall outline the general scope of the urban renewal project under consideration.

Where an authority intends to acquire private property by eminent domain within the urban renewal area to be subsequently transferred to a private party in accordance with the requirements of section 31-25-105.5 (2), the governing body, prior to the commencement of the acquisition of such property, shall first hold a public hearing on the use of eminent domain as a means to acquire such property after written notice of the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing has been provided to each owner of property within the meaning of section 31-25-105.5 that is within the urban renewal area at least thirty days prior to the date of the hearing. In order to authorize the use of eminent domain as a means to acquire property, a governing body shall base its decision on such authorization on a finding of blighted or slum conditions without regard to the economic performance of the property to be acquired.

(3.5) (a) At least thirty days prior to the hearing on an urban renewal plan or a substantial modification to such plan, regardless of when the urban renewal plan was first approved, the governing body or the authority shall submit such plan or modification to the board of county commissioners, and, if property taxes collected as a result of the county levy will be utilized, the governing body or the authority shall also submit an urban renewal impact report, which shall include, at a minimum, the following information concerning the impact of such plan:

The estimated duration of time to complete the urban renewal project;

The estimated annual property tax increment to be generated by the urban renewal project and the portion of such property tax increment to be allocated during this period to fund the urban renewal project;

An estimate of the impact of the urban renewal project on county revenues and on the cost and extent of additional county infrastructure and services required to serve development within the proposed urban renewal area, and the benefit of improvements within the urban renewal area to existing county infrastructure;

A statement setting forth the method under which the authority or the municipality will finance, or that agreements are in place to finance, any additional county infrastructure and services required to serve development in the urban renewal area for the period in which all or any portion of the property taxes described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section and levied by a county are paid to the authority; and

Any other estimated impacts of the urban renewal project on county services or revenues.

The inadvertent failure of a governing body or an authority to submit an urban renewal plan, substantial modification to the plan, or an urban renewal impact report, as applicable, to a board of county commissioners in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3.5) shall neither create a cause of action in favor of any party nor invalidate any urban renewal plan or modification to the plan.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a city and county shall not be required to submit an urban renewal impact report satisfying the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3.5).

(3.7) Upon request of the governing body or the authority, each county that is entitled to receive a copy of the plan shall provide available county data and projections to assist the governing body or the authority in preparing the urban renewal impact report required pursuant to subsection (3.5) of this section.

Following such hearing, the governing body may approve an urban renewal plan if it finds that:

A feasible method exists for the relocation of individuals and families who will be displaced by the urban renewal project in decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations within their means and without undue hardship to such individuals and families;

A feasible method exists for the relocation of business concerns that will be displaced by the urban renewal project in the urban renewal area or in other areas that are not generally less desirable with respect to public utilities and public and commercial facilities;

The governing body has taken reasonable efforts to provide written notice of the public hearing prescribed by subsection (3) of this section to all property owners, residents, and owners of business concerns in the proposed urban renewal area at their last known address of record at least thirty days prior to such hearing. Such notice shall contain the same information as is required for the notice described in subsection (3) of this section.

No more than one hundred twenty days have passed since the commencement of the first public hearing of the urban renewal plan pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;

Except for urban renewal plans subject to section 31-25-103 (2)(l), if the urban renewal plan contains property that was included in a previously submitted urban renewal plan that the governing body failed to approve pursuant to this section, at least twenty-four months shall have passed since the commencement of the prior public hearing concerning such property pursuant to subsection (3) of this section unless substantial changes have occurred since the commencement of such hearing that result in such property constituting a blighted area pursuant to section 31-25-103;

The urban renewal plan conforms to the general plan of the municipality as a whole;

The urban renewal plan will afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality as a whole, for the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban renewal area by private enterprise; and

The authority or the municipality will adequately finance, or that agreements are in place to finance, any additional county infrastructure and services required to serve development within the urban renewal area for the period in which all or any portion of the property taxes described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section and levied by a county are paid to the authority.

(4.5) In addition to the findings otherwise required to be made by the governing body pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, where an urban renewal plan seeks to acquire private property by eminent domain for subsequent transfer to a private party pursuant to section 31-25-105.5 (2), the governing body may approve the urban renewal plan where it finds, in connection with a hearing satisfying the requirements of subsection (3) of this section, that the urban renewal plan has met the requirements of section 31-25-105.5 (2) and that the principal public purpose for adoption of the urban renewal plan is to facilitate redevelopment in order to eliminate or prevent the spread of physically blighted or slum areas.

In case the urban renewal area consists of an area of open land which, under the urban renewal plan, is to be developed for residential uses, the governing body shall comply with the applicable provisions of this section and shall also determine that a shortage of housing of sound standards and design which is decent, safe, and sanitary exists in the municipality; that the need for housing accommodations has been or will be increased as a result of the clearance of slums in other areas (including other portions of the urban renewal area); that the conditions of blight in the urban renewal area and the shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary housing cause or contribute to an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare; and that the acquisition of the area for residential uses is an integral part of and essential to the program of the municipality.

In case the urban renewal area consists of an area of open land which, under the urban renewal plan, is to be developed for nonresidential uses, the local governing body shall comply with the applicable provisions of this section and shall also determine that such nonresidential uses are necessary and appropriate to facilitate the proper growth and development of the community in accordance with sound planning standards and local community objectives and that the contemplated acquisition of the area may require the exercise of governmental action, as provided in this part 1, because of being in a blighted area.

An urban renewal plan may be modified at any time; but, if modified after the lease or sale by the authority of real property in the urban renewal project area, such modification shall be subject to such rights at law or in equity as a lessee or purchaser or his successor in interest may be entitled to assert. Any proposed modification shall be submitted to the governing body for approval. If the modification will substantially change provisions of the urban renewal plan regarding land area, land use, authorization to collect incremental tax revenue, the extent of the use of tax increment financing, the scope or nature of the urban renewal project, the scope or method of financing, design, building requirements, timing, or procedure, as previously approved, or where such modification will substantially clarify a plan that, when approved, was lacking in specificity as to the urban renewal project or financing, then the modification is substantial and subject to all of the requirements of this section. For urban renewal plans in which a pledge of the revenues deposited into the special fund created pursuant to subsection (9) of this section was made by an indenture or other legally binding document that is separate from the plan itself prior to January 1, 2016, a pledge to secure the payment of refunding bonds is not a substantial modification and is not subject to the requirements of this subsection (7). Not less than thirty days prior to approving any modification of an urban renewal plan, the governing body or urban renewal authority shall provide a detailed written description of the proposed modification to each taxing entity that levies taxes on property located within the urban renewal area and a notice of the date and time of the meeting at which the governing body will consider the modification. Any taxing entity that levies taxes on property located within the urban renewal area may file an action in the state district court exercising jurisdiction over the county in which the urban renewal area is located for an order determining, under a de novo standard of review, whether the modification is a substantial modification. Further, if requested by the taxing entity, the court shall enjoin any action by the authority pursuant to the modification until the court has determined whether the modification is a substantial modification and, if so, shall further enjoin any action by the authority until there has been compliance with subsection (9.5) of this section.

(7.5) No action may be brought to enjoin any undertaking or activity of the authority pursuant to an urban renewal plan, including the issuance of bonds, the incurrence of other financial obligations, or the pledge of revenue, unless the action is commenced within forty-five days after the date on which the authority provided notice of its intention regarding such undertaking or activity. The notice must describe the undertaking or activity proposed to be engaged in by the authority and specify that any action to enjoin the undertaking or activity must be brought within forty-five days from the date of the notice. The notice must be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. On or before the date of publication of the notice, the authority shall also mail a copy of the notice to each taxing entity that levies taxes on property within the urban renewal area.

Upon the approval by the governing body of an urban renewal plan or a substantial modification thereof, the provisions of said plan with respect to the land area, land use, design, building requirements, timing, or procedure applicable to the property covered by said plan shall be controlling with respect thereto.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any urban renewal plan, as originally approved or as later modified pursuant to this part 1, may contain a provision that the property taxes of specifically designated public bodies, if any, levied after the effective date of the approval of such urban renewal plan upon taxable property in an urban renewal area each year or that municipal sales taxes collected within said area, or both such taxes, by or for the benefit of the designated public body must be divided for a period not to exceed twenty-five years after the effective date of adoption of such a provision, as follows:

That portion of the taxes which are produced by the levy at the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the valuation for assessment of taxable property in the urban renewal area last certified prior to the effective date of approval of the urban renewal plan or, as to an area later added to the urban renewal area, the effective date of the modification of the plan, or that portion of municipal sales taxes collected within the boundaries of said urban renewal area in the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the month prior to the effective date of approval of said plan, or both such portions, shall be paid into the funds of each such public body as are all other taxes collected by or for said public body.

That portion of said property taxes or all or any portion of said sales taxes, or both, in excess of the amount of property taxes or sales taxes paid into the funds of each such public body in accordance with the requirements of subsection (9)(a)(I) of this section must be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund of the authority to pay the principal of, the interest on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans or advances to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, the authority for financing or refinancing, in whole or in part, an urban renewal project, or to make payments under an agreement executed pursuant to this section. Any excess municipal sales tax or property tax collections not allocated pursuant to this subsection (9)(a)(II) must be paid into the funds of the municipality or other taxing entity, as applicable. Unless and until the total valuation for assessment of the taxable property in an urban renewal area exceeds the base valuation for assessment of the taxable property in such urban renewal area, as provided in subsection (9)(a)(I) of this section, all of the taxes levied upon the taxable property in such urban renewal area must be paid into the funds of the respective public bodies. Unless and until the total municipal sales tax collections in an urban renewal area exceed the base year municipal sales tax collections in such urban renewal area, as provided in subsection (9)(a)(I) of this section, all such sales tax collections must be paid into the funds of the municipality. When such bonds, loans, advances, and indebtedness, if any, including interest thereon and any premiums due in connection therewith, have been paid, all taxes upon the taxable property or the total municipal sales tax collections, or both, in such urban renewal area must be paid into the funds of the respective public bodies, and all money remaining in the special fund established pursuant to this subsection (9)(a)(II) that has not previously been rebated and that originated as property tax increment generated based on the mill levy of a taxing body, other than the municipality, within the boundaries of the urban renewal area must be repaid to each taxing body based on the pro rata share of the prior year's property tax increment attributable to each taxing body's current mill levy in which property taxes were divided pursuant to this subsection (9). Any money remaining in the special fund not generated by property tax increment is excluded from any such repayment requirement. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any additional revenues resulting because the voters have authorized the municipality, county, special district, or school district to retain and spend said revenues pursuant to section 20 (7)(d) of article X of the state constitution subsequent to the creation of the special fund pursuant to this subsection (9)(a)(II) or as a result of an increase in the property tax mill levy approved by the voters of the municipality, county, special district, or school district subsequent to the creation of the special fund, to the extent the total mill levy of the municipality, county, special district, or school district exceeds the respective mill levy in effect at the time of approval or substantial modification of the urban renewal plan, shall not be pledged by an authority for the payment of any bonds of, any loans or advances to, or any indebtedness incurred by the authority without the consent of the relevant municipality, county, special district, or school district. To the extent the authority has received the notification specified in this subsection (9)(a)(II), such additional revenues shall then be promptly repaid by the authority to the municipality or other taxing entity. The authority shall be notified of the amount of additional revenues and the calculations used in computing the amount by the applicable municipality or other taxing entity prior to making repayment and, in any event, not later than February 1 in each fiscal year following the year in which a voter-approved revenue increase has taken effect. The authority and municipality or any other taxing entity may negotiate for the purpose of entering into an agreement on the issues of the amount of repayment, the mechanics of how repayment of the additional revenues will be accomplished, a method for resolving disputes regarding the amount of repayment, and whether the municipality or taxing entity will waive the repayment requirement, singularly or in combination, and may enter into an intergovernmental agreement regarding any of these issues.

In calculating and making payments as described in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), the county treasurer may offset the authority's pro rata portion of any property taxes that are paid to the authority under the terms of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) and that are subsequently refunded to the taxpayer against any subsequent payments due to the authority for the urban renewal project. The authority shall make adequate provision for the return of overpayments in the event that there are not sufficient property taxes due to the authority to offset the authority's pro rata portion of the refunds. The authority may establish a reserve fund for this purpose or enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the municipal governing body in which the municipality assumes responsibility for the return of the overpayments. The provisions of this subparagraph (III) shall not apply to a city and county.

The portion of taxes described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (9) may be irrevocably pledged by the authority for the payment of the principal of, the interest on, and any premiums due in connection with such bonds, loans, advances, and indebtedness. This irrevocable pledge shall not extend to any taxes that are placed in a reserve fund to be returned to the county for refunds of overpayments by taxpayers; except that this limitation on the extension of the irrevocable pledge shall not apply to a city and county.

As used in this subsection (9), the word "taxes" shall include, without limitation, all levies authorized to be made on an ad valorem basis upon real and personal property or municipal sales taxes; but nothing in this subsection (9) shall be construed to require any public body to levy taxes.

In the case of urban renewal areas, including single- and multiple-family residences, school districts which include all or any part of such urban renewal area shall be permitted to participate in an advisory capacity with respect to the inclusion in an urban renewal plan of the provision provided for by this subsection (9).

In the event there is a general reassessment of taxable property valuations in any county including all or part of the urban renewal area subject to division of valuation for assessment under paragraph (a) of this subsection (9) or a change in the sales tax percentage levied in any municipality including all or part of the urban renewal area subject to division of sales taxes under paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), the portions of valuations for assessment or sales taxes under both subparagraphs (I) and (II) of said paragraph (a) shall be proportionately adjusted in accordance with such reassessment or change.

Notwithstanding the twenty-five-year period of limitation set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), any urban renewal plan, as originally approved or as later modified pursuant to this part 1, may contain a provision that the municipal sales taxes collected in an urban renewal area each year or the municipal portion of taxes levied upon taxable property within such area, or both such taxes, may be allocated as described in this subsection (9) for a period in excess of twenty-five years after the effective date of the adoption of such provision if the existing bonds are in default or about to go into default; except that such taxes shall not be allocated after all bonds of the authority issued pursuant to such plan including loans, advances, and indebtedness, if any, and interest thereon, and any premiums due in connection therewith have been paid.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if one or more of the conditions specified in subparagraph (II), or all of the conditions specified in subparagraph (III), of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section have been satisfied such that agricultural land is included within an urban renewal area, the county assessor shall value the agricultural land at its fair market value in making the calculation of the taxes to be paid to the public bodies pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (9) solely for the purpose of determining the tax increment available pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (9). Nothing in this section shall affect the actual classification, or require reclassification, of agricultural land for property tax purposes, and nothing in this section shall affect the taxes actually to be paid to the public bodies pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), which shall continue to be based on the agricultural classification of such land unless and until it has been reclassified in the normal course of the assessment process.

The manner and methods by which the requirements of this subsection (9) are to be implemented by county assessors shall be contained in such manuals, appraisal procedures, and instructions, as applicable, that the property tax administrator is authorized to prepare and publish pursuant to section 39-2-109 (1)(e), C.R.S.

Within the twelve-month period prior to the effective date of the approval or modification of the urban renewal plan requiring the allocation of moneys to the authority pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), the municipality, county, special district, or school district is entitled to the reimbursement of any moneys that such municipality, county, special district, or school district pays to, contributes to, or invests in the authority for the project. The reimbursement is to be paid from the special fund of the authority established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (9).

(9.5) (a) Before any urban renewal plan containing any tax allocation provisions that allocates any taxes of any taxing entity other than the municipality may be approved by the municipal governing body pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the authority shall notify the board of county commissioners of each county and the governing boards of each other taxing entity whose incremental property tax revenues would be allocated under such proposed plan. Representatives of the authority and the governing body of each taxing entity shall then meet and attempt to negotiate an agreement governing the sharing of incremental property tax revenue allocated to the special fund of the authority established in accordance with subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section. The agreement must address, without limitation, estimated impacts of the urban renewal plan on county or district services associated solely with the urban renewal plan. The agreement may be entered into separately among the authority and each such taxing entity, or through a joint agreement among the authority and any taxing entity that has chosen to enter that agreement. Any such shared incremental tax revenues governed by any agreement are limited to all or any portion of the incremental revenue generated by the taxes levied upon taxable property by the taxing entity within the area covered by the urban renewal plan in addition to any incremental sales tax revenues generated within the area covered by the urban renewal plan by the imposition of the sales tax of the municipality and, at the option of any other taxing entity levying a sales tax in the area covered by the urban renewal plan, any incremental sales tax revenues of such other taxing entity that are included within the agreement.

The agreement described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (9.5) may provide for a waiver of any provision of this part 1 that provides for notice to the taxing entity, requires any filing with or by the taxing entity, requires or permits consent from the taxing entity, or provides any enforcement right to the taxing entity.

If, after a period of one hundred twenty days from the date of notice or such longer or shorter period as the authority and any taxing entity may agree, there is no agreement between the authority and any taxing entity as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (9.5), the authority and any applicable taxing entity are subject to the provisions and limitations of paragraph (d) of this subsection (9.5).

In an absence of an agreement between the authority and any taxing entity as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (9.5), the parties must submit to mediation on the issue of appropriate sharing of incremental property tax revenues and urban renewal project costs among the authority and any such taxing entities whose incremental property tax revenues will be allocated pursuant to an urban renewal plan and with whom an intergovernmental agreement with the authority has not been reached.

The mediation required by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) must be conducted by a mediator who has been jointly selected by the parties; except that, if the parties are unable to agree on the selection of a mediator, then the authority shall select one mediator, the other parties shall select a second mediator, and these two mediators shall then select a third mediator. In such circumstances, the mediation will be jointly conducted by the three mediators. Unless all parties otherwise agree, any mediator selected pursuant to this paragraph (d) must be an attorney licensed in the state for at least ten years and must be experienced in both land use and administrative law. Payment of the fees and costs for the mediation must be split equally between or among the parties.

In making a determination of the appropriate sharing, the mediator must consider the nature of the project, the nature and relative size of the revenue and other benefits that are expected to accrue to the municipality and other taxing entities as a result of the project, any legal limitations on the use of revenues belonging to the authority or any taxing entity, and any capital or operating costs that are expected to result from the project. Within ninety days, the mediator must issue his or her findings of fact as to the appropriate sharing of costs and incremental property tax revenues, and shall promptly transmit such information to the parties. With respect to the use of incremental property tax revenues of each other taxing entity, following the issuance of findings by the mediator, the governing body of the municipality shall:

Incorporate the mediator's findings on the use of incremental property tax revenues of any taxing body into the urban renewal plan and proceed to adopt the plan;

Amend the urban renewal plan to delete authorization of the use of the incremental property tax revenues of any taxing body with whom an agreement has not been reached; or

Direct the authority to either incorporate the mediator's findings into one or more intergovernmental agreements with other taxing entities or to enter into new negotiations with one or more taxing entities and to enter into one or more intergovernmental agreements with such taxing entities that incorporate such new or different provisions concerning the sharing of costs and incremental property tax revenues with which the parties are in agreement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no incremental property tax revenues may be allocated and paid into the special fund of the authority in accordance with subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section unless the municipality or the authority has satisfied the requirements of this subsection (9.5).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a city and county is not required to reach an agreement with a county satisfying the requirements of this subsection (9.5).

For purposes of this subsection (9.5), "taxing entity" means any county, special district, or other public body that levies an ad valorem property tax on property within the urban renewal area subject to a tax allocation provision.

(9.6) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing body of the municipality, as applicable, may provide in an urban renewal plan that the valuation attributable to the extraction of mineral resources located within the urban renewal area shall not be subject to the division that is otherwise required by subsection (9)(a) of this section. In such circumstances, the taxes levied on the valuation will be distributed to the public bodies as if the urban renewal plan was not in effect.

For purposes of this subsection (9.6):

"Mineral resources" has the same meaning as specified in section 36-1-100.3 (3).

"Valuation attributable to the extraction of mineral resources" includes:

The value of oil and gas leaseholds and land and subsurface oil and gas well equipment that is valued for assessment purposes as real property under sections 39-7-102 and 39-7-103; and

Surface oil and gas well equipment and submersible pumps and sucker rods located on oil and gas leaseholds and land that is valued for assessment purposes as personal property under section 39-7-103.

(9.7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

Nothing in subsection (9.5) of this section, as added by House Bill 15-1348, enacted in 2015, and as amended by Senate Bill 16-177, enacted in 2016, is intended to impair, jeopardize, or put at risk any existing bonds, investments, loans, contracts, or financial obligations of an urban renewal authority outstanding as of December 31, 2015, or the pledge of pledged revenues or assets to the payment thereof that occurred on or before December 31, 2015.

The requirements of section 31-25-104 (2)(a), (2)(b), and (2.5), section 31-25-115 (1.5), the introductory portion of subsection (9)(a) of this section, subsections (9)(a)(II), (9)(i), and (9.5) of this section, as added by House Bill 15-1348, enacted in 2015, and as amended by Senate Bill 16-177, enacted in 2016, and the requirements of subsections (7) and (7.5) of this section as amended by Senate Bill 17-279, enacted in 2017, and the requirements of subsection (9)(a)(II) of this section as amended by Senate Bill 18-248, enacted in 2018, apply to municipalities, urban renewal authorities, and any urban renewal plans created on or after January 1, 2016, and to any substantial modification of any urban renewal plan where the modification is approved on or after January 1, 2016.

The municipality in which an urban renewal authority has been established pursuant to the provisions of this part 1 shall timely notify the assessor of the county in which such authority has been established when:

An urban renewal plan or a substantial modification of such plan has been approved that contains the provision referenced in paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section or a substantial modification of the plan adds land to the plan, which plan contains the provision referenced in paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section;

Any outstanding obligation incurred by such authority pursuant to the provisions of subsection (9) of this section has been paid off; and

The purposes of such authority have otherwise been achieved.
